District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.05a

Pre-licensing education.

(a)

The Commissioner may require, by rule, that an individual, other than an applicant for a title insurance producer license, complete a pre-licensing course of study before:

(1)

Taking the examination required by § 31-1131.05; or

(2)

Applying for an insurance producer license.

(b)

An insurer that sells, solicits, or negotiates a limited line of insurance in the District shall provide to each individual whose duties will include selling, soliciting, or negotiating the insurer’s limited line of insurance in the District a program of instruction that is approved by the Commissioner. The insurer shall provide the program of instruction to the individual prior to the individual’s application for licensure as a limited lines insurance producer.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 5a
as added May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-155, § 2(d), 55 DCR 3683
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2166(b), 57 DCR 6242
This section is referenced in § 31-1131.09 and § 31-5051.02.
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (a), substituted “individual, other than an applicant for a title insurance producer license, complete” for “individual complete”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2166(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).